test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_fadda_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:
  
  Noun - čuhčá:
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Nom:  čuhčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Gen:  čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Acc:  čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Ill:  čuuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Loc:  čuuvčást
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Com:  čuvččáin
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Abe:  čuˊvčáttáá
    čuhčá+N+Ess:  čuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Par: čuhčád
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Nom:  [čuuvčáh, čuˊvčáh]
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Gen:  [čuuvčái, čuˊvčái]
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Acc:  čuuvčáid
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Ill:  čuvččáid
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Loc:  čuuvčáin
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Com:  čuˊvčáiguin
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Abe:  čuˊvčáittáá

  Noun - fáddá:
    fáddá+N+Sg+Nom:  fáddá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Gen:  fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Acc:  fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Ill:  fáádán
    fáddá+N+Sg+Loc:  fáádást
    fáddá+N+Sg+Com:  fáddáin
    fáddá+N+Sg+Abe:  fáˊdáttáá
    fáddá+N+Ess:  fáddán
    fáddá+N+Par: fáddád
    fáddá+N+Pl+Nom:  fáádáh
    fáddá+N+Pl+Gen: [fáádái, fáˊdái]
    fáddá+N+Pl+Acc:  fáádáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Ill:  fáddáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Loc:  fáádáin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Com:  fáˊdáiguin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Abe:  fáˊdáittáá

  Noun - lággá:
    lággá+N+Sg+Nom:  lággá
    lággá+N+Sg+Gen:  láágá
    lággá+N+Sg+Acc:  láágá
    lággá+N+Sg+Ill:  láágán
    lággá+N+Sg+Loc:  láágást
    lággá+N+Sg+Com:  lággáin
    lággá+N+Sg+Abe:  láˊgáttáá
    lággá+N+Ess:  lággán
    lággá+N+Par: lággád
    lággá+N+Pl+Nom:  láágáh
    lággá+N+Pl+Gen:  [láágái, láˊgái]
    lággá+N+Pl+Acc:  láágáid
    lággá+N+Pl+Ill:  lággáid
    lággá+N+Pl+Loc:  láágáin
    lággá+N+Pl+Com:  láˊgáiguin
    lággá+N+Pl+Abe:  láˊgáittáá

  Noun - lássá:
    lássá+N+Sg+Nom:  lássá
    lássá+N+Sg+Gen:  lááṣá
    lássá+N+Sg+Acc:  lááṣá
    lássá+N+Sg+Ill:  lááṣán
    lássá+N+Sg+Loc:  lááṣást
    lássá+N+Sg+Com:  lássáin
    lássá+N+Sg+Abe:  láˊṣáttáá
    lássá+N+Ess:  lássán
    lássá+N+Par: lássád
    lássá+N+Pl+Nom:  lááṣáh
    lássá+N+Pl+Gen: [lááṣái, láˊṣái]
    lássá+N+Pl+Acc:  lááṣáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Ill:  lássáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Loc:  lááṣáin
    lássá+N+Pl+Com:  láˊṣáiguin
    lássá+N+Pl+Abe:  láˊṣáittáá

  Noun - ráksá:
    ráksá+N+Sg+Nom:  ráksá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Ill:  rááksán
    ráksá+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávsást
    ráksá+N+Sg+Com:  rávssáin
    ráksá+N+Sg+Abe:  ráˊvsáttáá
    ráksá+N+Ess:  ráksán
    ráksá+N+Par: ráksád
    ráksá+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávsáh
    ráksá+N+Pl+Gen: [ráávsái, ráˊvsái]
    ráksá+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávsáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Ill:  rávssáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávsáin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Com:  ráˊvsáiguin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Abe:  ráˊvsáittáá

  
  Noun - luákká:
    luákká+N+Sg+Nom:  luákˊká
    luákká+N+Sg+Gen:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Acc:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Ill:  luákán
    luákká+N+Sg+Loc:  luáhást
    luákká+N+Sg+Com:  luáhˊháin
    luákká+N+Sg+Abe:  luáˊháttáá
    luákká+N+Ess:  luákˊkán
    luákká+N+Par:  luákˊkád
    luákká+N+Pl+Nom:  luáháh
    luákká+N+Pl+Gen: [luáhái, luáˊhái]
    luákká+N+Pl+Acc:  luáháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Ill:  luáhˊháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Loc:  luáháin
    luákká+N+Pl+Com:  luáˊháiguin
    luákká+N+Pl+Abe:  luáˊháittáá

  Noun - kiälkká:
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Nom:  kiälˊkká
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Gen:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Acc:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Ill:  kiälkán
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Loc:  kiälhást
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Com:  kiälˊháin
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäˊlháttáá
    kiälkká+N+Ess:  kiälˊkkán
    kiälkká+N+Par:  kiälˊkkád
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Nom:  kiälháh
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Gen: [kiälhái, kiäˊlhái]
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Acc:  kiälháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Ill:  kiälˊháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Loc:  kiälháin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Com:  kiäˊlháiguin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäˊlháittáá


  Noun - kuáddá:
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Nom:  kuádˊdá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Gen:  kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Acc: kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Ill:  kuádán
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Loc:  kuádást
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Com:  kuádˊdáin
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊdáttáá
    kuáddá+N+Ess:  kuádˊdán
    kuáddá+N+Par: kuádˊdád
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Nom:  kuádáh
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Gen: [kuádái, kuáˊdái]
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Acc:  kuádáid
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Ill:  kuádˊdáid
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Loc:  kuádáin
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊdáiguin
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊdáittáá
    
